src/pronounfile.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +PRP/Art +mas +fem +sg +pl ^GN1 ^GN2 ^GN3 ^GN4
LEXICON Root
alguien+PRP/Art:alguien #;
algo+PRP/Art:algo #;
alguno+PRP/Art:alguno #;
ambas+PRP/Art:ambas #;
ambos+PRP/Art:ambos #;
aquel+PRP/Art:aquel #;
aquello+PRP/Art:aquello #;
aquesta+PRP/Art:aquesta #;
aqueste+PRP/Art:aqueste #;
aquestos+PRP/Art:aquestos #;
conmigo+PRP/Art:conmigo #;
consigo+PRP/Art:consigo #;
contigo+PRP/Art:contigo #;
cual+PRP/Art:cual #;
cualquiera+PRP/Art:cualquiera #;
cuanto+PRP/Art:cuanto #;
cuyo+PRP/Art:cuyo #;
adonde+PRP/Art:adonde #;

aquel+PRP/Art:aquel #;
aquella+PRP/Art:aquella #;
aquel+PRP/Art:aquel #;

aquel+PRP/Art:aquel #;
aquesta+PRP/Art:aquesta #;
aquesta+PRP/Art:aquesta #;
aqueste+PRP/Art:aqueste #;
aqueste+PRP/Art:aqueste #;

aquestos+PRP/Art:aquestos #;

cual+PRP/Art:cual #;
cual+PRP/Art:cual #;
cual+PRP/Art:cual #;

cuanto+PRP/Art:cuanto #;
cuanto+PRP/Art:cuanto #;
cuanto+PRP/Art:cuanto #;
cuanto+PRP/Art:cuanto #;
cuanto+PRP/Art:cuanto #;
cuyo+PRP/Art:cuyo #;
demas+PRP/Art:demas #;
donde+PRP/Art:donde #;
donde+PRP/Art:donde #;
el+PRP/Art:el #;
ella+PRP/Art:ella #;
ello+PRP/Art:ello #;
el+PRP/Art:el #;
ese+PRP/Art:ese #;
esa+PRP/Art:esa #;
ese+PRP/Art:ese #;
esa+PRP/Art:esa #;
ese+PRP/Art:ese #;
ese+PRP/Art:ese #;
eso+PRP/Art:eso #;
ese+PRP/Art:ese #;
ese+PRP/Art:ese #;
este+PRP/Art:este #;
esta+PRP/Art:esta #;
este+PRP/Art:este #;
esta+PRP/Art:esta #;
este+PRP/Art:este #;
este+PRP/Art:este #;
esto+PRP/Art:esto #;
este+PRP/Art:este #;
este+PRP/Art:este #;
ella+PRP/Art:ella #;
el+PRP/Art:el #;
ello+PRP/Art:ello #;
el+PRP/Art:el #;
yo+PRP/Art:yo #;
mia+PRP/Art:mia #;
mio+PRP/Art:mio #;
mi+PRP/Art:mi #;
mismo+PRP/Art:mismo #;
mucho+PRP/Art:mucho #;
nada+PRP/Art:nada #;
nadie+PRP/Art:nadie #;
ninguno+PRP/Art:ninguno #;
yo+PRP/Art:yo #;
nuestro+PRP/Art:nuestro #;
tu+PRP/Art:tu #;
otro+PRP/Art:otro #;
poco+PRP/Art:poco #;
primero+PRP/Art:primero #;
que+PRP/Art:que #;
que+PRP/Art:que #;
quien+PRP/Art:quien #;
quien+PRP/Art:quien #;
quien+PRP/Art:quien #;
quien+PRP/Art:quien #;
quinto+PRP/Art:quinto #;
el+PRP/Art:el #;
segundo+PRP/Art:segundo #;
si+PRP/Art:si #;
sus+PRP/Art:sus #;
suya+PRP/Art:suya #;
suyo+PRP/Art:suyo #;
tu+PRP/Art:tu #;
tercer+PRP/Art:tercer #;
tu+PRP/Art:tu #;
todo+PRP/Art:todo #;
tu+PRP/Art:tu #;
tu+PRP/Art:tu #;
tuyo+PRP/Art:tuyo #;
ultimo+PRP/Art:ultimo #;
uno+PRP/Art:uno #;
usted+PRP/Art:usted #;
tu+PRP/Art:tu #;
vuestro+PRP/Art:vuestro #;
yo+PRP/Art:yo #;
me+PRP/Art:me #;
lo+PRP/Art:lo #;
